District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.10

TANF income eligibility standards.

(a)

When the gross income of family applying for, or receiving TANF exceeds 100% of the standard of assistance for a family of the same composition, as set forth in § 4-205.52, the family is not eligible for assistance. Income deemed from stepparents shall be counted in gross family income to the extent permitted pursuant to § 4-205.22. Income deemed from an alien sponsor shall be counted in gross family income to the extent required by § 421 of the Personal Responsibility and Work Opportunity Reconciliation Act of 1996, approved August 22, 1996 (110 Stat. 2105; 8 U.S.C. § 1631). Payments to correct underpayments to TANF or POWER recipients are not considered income or as a resource either in the month the payment is made or in the following month.

(b)

If the gross income, computed pursuant to subsection (a) of this section, is 100% or less of the standard of assistance, financial conditions of eligibility shall be calculated in accordance with § 4-205.11, 4-205.29, 4-205.33(b), and 4-217.05.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 510, 29 DCR 1060
Mar. 14, 1985, D.C. Law 5-150, § 2(b), 31 DCR 6425
Sept. 10, 1985, D.C. Law 6-35, § 2(c), 32 DCR 3778
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(l), 46 DCR 905

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-205.10.

Temporary Amendment of Section

For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(l) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(l) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(l) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(l) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(l) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).